Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202542-901
Act, how cited.

Sections 42-901 to 42-930 shall be known and may be cited as the Protection from Domestic Abuse Act.

Laws 1978, LB 623, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 330, § 4;

Laws 1997, LB 829, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 218, § 17;

Laws 2025, LB80, § 39.